California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) The department shall review and, upon approval by the appropriate state agencies, shall transmit the APD to the federal Department of Health and Human Services. The department shall facilitate assistance as appropriate to gain federal approval of the APD. Implementation of the pilot system shall be contingent upon federal approval of the APD and of the request for federal funding consistent with the child welfare services program. It shall also be contingent upon assurance by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services that the federal funding for the CWS/CMS shall not be adversely impacted by the development and implementation of the Passport System. If the department is unable to gain federal approval of the pilot project by January 1, 2004, authorization for the pilot project established by this section shall cease.

(3) The Passport System shall provide real-time access to health, mental health, and educational information by health and mental health care providers, educators, licensed or approved foster care givers, and local agency staff in order to improve the accuracy and reliability of information necessary to ensure receipt of appropriate services for children in foster care, to improve health and educational outcomes, and to reduce and eliminate the risk of inadequate treatment by service providers, multiple immunizations, other severe health and education problems, and death.

(4) The Passport System shall meet all the operational and administrative needs of local participating agencies; be scalable and flexible to interface with and integrate data from multiple Los Angeles County and other county departments and state agencies that provide services to children, using data matching algorithms that provide a high level of confidence and reliability; maximize the use and availability of information in a secured and reliable environment; allow relevant county staff, health, mental health, education providers, and licensed or approved foster care givers to update or view appropriate data through a web-enabled application via the Internet; contain fire walls and safeguards to ensure that only authorized persons inquire and update only those cases which they have been authorized to access; and to ensure the integrity and confidentiality of the system.

(b) Prior to commencement of the pilot project, Los Angeles County, in consultation with the department, shall develop a pilot evaluation plan subject to approval by the department and the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services. The plan shall include, but is not limited to, identification of measurable objectives, and benefits that the pilot project is expected to achieve, the methodology, and plan criteria for evaluating the pilot project.

(c) The pilot plan shall include a strategy to incentivize health, mental health, and educational providers servicing foster children to utilize and update the Internet-based system.

(d) Implementation of the interface between the Internet-based Passport System and the CWS/CMS shall be contingent upon approval of federal reimbursement consistent with the child welfare services program. Funding shall be subject to the sharing ratios that apply to the administration of child welfare services programs. Any funds appropriated for this purpose not expended in the 2001–02 fiscal year shall be available for the purposes of this section as expenditure in subsequent years. After one year of operation of the pilot project, Los Angeles County shall complete a pilot evaluation as described in the pilot evaluation plan. The results of the evaluation shall be provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal and policy committees of each house of the Legislature, the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the Department of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1022, Sec. 52.   Effective September 28, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

16013.

(a) It is the policy of this state that all persons engaged in providing care and services to foster children, including, but not limited to, foster parents, adoptive parents, relative caregivers, and other caregivers contracting with a county welfare department, shall have fair and equal access to all available programs, services, benefits, and licensing processes, and shall not be subjected to discrimination or harassment on the basis of their clients’ or their own actual or perceived race, ethnic group identification, ancestry, national origin, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, mental or physical disability, or HIV status.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to create or modify existing preferences for foster placements or to limit the local placement agency’s ability to make placement decisions for a child based on the child’s best interests.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 557, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

16014.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to maximize federal funding for foster youth services provided by local educational agencies.

(b) The State Department of Education and the State Department of Social Services shall collaborate with the County Welfare Directors Association, representatives from local educational agencies, and representatives of private, nonprofit foster care providers to establish roles and responsibilities, claiming requirements, and sharing of eligibility information eligible for funding under Part E (commencing with Section 470) of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.). These state agencies shall also assist counties and local educational agencies in drafting memorandums of understanding between agencies to access funding for case management activities associated with providing foster youth services for eligible children. That federal funding shall be an augmentation to the current program and shall not supplant existing state general funds allocated to this program.

(c) School districts shall be responsible for 100 percent of the nonfederal share of payments received under that act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 914, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. County Adoption Agencies [16100. - 16106.]

16100.

(a) Any county may perform the home-finding and placement functions, to investigate, examine, and make reports upon petitions for adoption filed in the superior court, to act as a placement agency in the placement of children for adoption, to accept relinquishments for adoption, and to perform such other functions in connection with adoption as the department deems necessary, or to do any of them. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a
 county adoption agency, as provided in subdivision (d), to provide intercountry adoption services.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a county adoption agency performing the functions specified in subdivision (a) may contract for services described in subdivision (a) from any licensed private adoption agency that the private adoption agency is licensed to provide pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code. A licensed county adoption agency may also contract for services described in subdivision (a) from any out-of-state licensed public or private adoption agency that is licensed
 pursuant to the laws of that state. Any services contracted for shall substantially meet the standards and criteria established in California adoption regulations as determined by the licensed county adoption agency. These services shall be contracted for in order to facilitate adoptive placement of a specified category of children for whom the licensed county adoption agency has determined it cannot provide adequate services.

(c) Counties that elect not to provide the adoption services specified in subdivision (a) may contract with the department or another county adoption agency to provide those services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 103.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

16101.

(a) Prior to the 2011–12 fiscal year, the cost of administering the adoption programs undertaken by a county under license issued pursuant to Section 16100 of this code shall be borne by the state in the amount found necessary by the department for proper and efficient administration. The state shall reimburse the county for all such necessary administrative costs, after deducting therefrom the amount of fees collected by the county agency pursuant to Section 8716 of the Family Code.

(b) Beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under the section for the purposes of administering the adoption programs shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 104.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

16105.

If any grants-in-aid are made by the federal government for the cost of administering an adoption program, or for the cost of care of children relinquished for adoption, the amount of the federal grant shall be applied to defer the cost of administration or of care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 105.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

16106.

The state shall reimburse each county for the cost of care of any child placed under the custody of a county department pursuant to Section 8805 or 8918 of the Family Code. County claims for reimbursement of expenses incurred pursuant to Section 8805 or 8918 of the Family Code shall be filed with the department at the time and in the manner specified by the department, and the claims shall be subject to audit by the department. Whenever a claim covering a prior fiscal year is found to have been in error, adjustment may be made on a current claim without the necessity of applying adjustment to the appropriation for the prior fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 157.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.1. Aid for Adoption of Children [16115. - 16125.]

16115.

Aid under this chapter shall be known as the Adoption Assistance Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 977, Sec. 18.   Effective September 13, 1982.   Operative October 1, 1982, by Sec. 36 of Ch. 977.)
-------------------------------------------

16115.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to benefit children residing in foster homes by providing the stability and security of permanent homes, and in so doing, achieve a reduction in foster home care. It is not the intent of this chapter to increase expenditures but to provide for payments to adoptive parents to enable them to meet the needs of children who meet the criteria established in Sections 16116, 16120, and 16121.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1087, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

16118.

(a) The department shall establish and administer the program to be carried out by the department or the county pursuant to this chapter. The department shall adopt any regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(b) The department shall keep the records necessary to evaluate the program’s effectiveness in encouraging and promoting the adoption of children eligible for the Adoption Assistance Program.

(c) The department or the county responsible for providing financial aid in the amount determined in Section 16120 shall have responsibility for certifying that the child meets the eligibility criteria and for determining the amount of
 financial assistance needed by the child and the adopting family.

(d) The department shall actively seek and make maximum use of federal funds that may be available for the purposes of this chapter. In accordance with federal law, any savings realized from the change in federal funding for adoption assistance resulting from the enactment of the federal Fostering Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-351) shall be spent for the provision of foster care and adoption services, and the counties shall annually report to the department how these savings are spent, including any expenditures for postadoption services. Not less than 30 percent of these savings shall be spent on postadoption services, postguardianship services, and services to support and sustain positive permanent outcomes for children who otherwise might enter into foster care. Of that 30-percent amount, at least two-thirds shall be spent on
 postadoption and postguardianship services. The process for submitting this information shall be developed by the department, in consultation with counties. All gifts or grants received from private sources for the purpose of this chapter shall be used to offset public costs incurred under the program established by this chapter.

(e) For purposes of this chapter, the county responsible for determining the child’s Adoption Assistance Program eligibility status and for providing financial aid in the amount determined in Sections 16120 and 16120.1 shall be the county that, at the time of the adoptive placement, would otherwise be responsible for making a payment pursuant to Section 11450 under the CalWORKs program or Section 11461 under the Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care program if the child were not adopted. When the child has been voluntarily relinquished for adoption prior to a determination of eligibility for this payment,
 the responsible county shall be the county in which the relinquishing parent resides. The responsible county for all other eligible children shall be the county where the child is physically residing prior to placement with the adoptive family. The responsible county shall certify eligibility on a form prescribed by the department.

(f) Beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this section shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 425, Sec. 24.   (SB 794)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

16119.

(a) At the time application for adoption of a child who is potentially eligible for Adoption Assistance Program benefits is made, and at the time immediately prior to the finalization of the adoption decree, the department, county adoption agency, or the licensed adoption agency, whichever is appropriate, shall provide the prospective adoptive family with information, in writing, on the availability of Adoption Assistance Program benefits, with an explanation of the difference between these benefits and foster care payments. The department, county adoption agency, or the licensed adoption agency shall also provide the prospective adoptive family with information, in writing, on the availability of reimbursement for the nonrecurring expenses incurred in the adoption of the Adoption Assistance Program eligible child. The
 department, county adoption agency, or licensed adoption agency shall also provide the prospective adoptive family with information on the availability of mental health services through the Medi-Cal program or other programs, including information, in writing, regarding the importance of working with mental health providers that have specialized adoption or permanency clinical training and experience if the family needs clinical support, and a description of the desirable clinical expertise the family should look for when choosing an adoption- or permanency-competent mental health professional. The department, county adoption agency, or licensed adoption agency shall also provide information regarding
 the federal adoption tax credit for any individual who is adopting or considering adopting a child in foster care, in accordance with Section 403 of the federal Fostering Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-351).

(b) The department, county adoption agency, or licensed adoption agency shall encourage families that elect not to sign an adoption assistance agreement to sign a deferred adoption assistance agreement.

(c) The department or the county, whichever is responsible for determining the child’s eligibility for the Adoption Assistance Program, shall assess the needs of the child and the circumstances of the family.

(d) (1) The amount of an adoption assistance cash benefit, if any, shall be a negotiated amount based upon the needs of the child and the
 circumstances of the family. There shall be no means test used to determine an adoptive family’s eligibility for the Adoption Assistance Program, or the amount of adoption assistance payments. In those instances where an otherwise eligible child does not require a cash benefit, Medi-Cal eligibility may be established for the child, as needed.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), “circumstances of the family” includes the family’s ability to incorporate the child into the household in relation to the lifestyle, standard of living, and future plans and to the overall capacity to meet the immediate and future plans and needs, including education, of the child.

(e) The department, county adoption agency, or licensed adoption agency shall inform the prospective adoptive family regarding the county responsible for providing financial aid to the adoptive family in an amount determined
 pursuant to Sections 16120 and 16120.1.

(f) The department, county adoption agency, or licensed adoption agency shall inform the prospective adoptive family that the adoptive parents will continue to receive benefits in the agreed upon amount unless one of the following occurs:

(1) The department or county adoption agency determines that the adoptive parents are no longer legally responsible for the support of the child.

(2) The department or county adoption agency determines that the child is no longer receiving support from the adoptive family.

(3) The adoption assistance payment exceeds the amount that the child would have been eligible for in a licensed foster
 home, or a resource family at the basic rate, inclusive of any level of care rate determination.

(4) The adoptive parents demonstrate a need for an increased payment.

(5) The adoptive parents voluntarily reduce or terminate payments.

(6) The adopted child has an extraordinary need that was not anticipated at the time the amount of the adoption assistance was originally negotiated.

(g) The department, county adoption agency, or licensed adoption agency shall inform the prospective adoptive family of their potential eligibility for a federal tax credit under Section 23 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 23) and a state tax credit under Section 17052.25 of the Revenue and Taxation
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 95.5.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16120.

A child is eligible for Adoption Assistance Program benefits if all of the conditions specified in subdivisions (a) to (l), inclusive, are met or if the conditions specified in subdivision (m) are met.

(a) (1) It has been determined that the child cannot or should not be returned to the home of the child’s parents as evidenced by any of the following:

(A) A petition for termination of parental rights.

(B) A court order terminating parental rights.

(C) A signed relinquishment.

(D) In the case of a tribal customary adoption, the court has given full faith and credit to a tribal customary adoption order as provided for pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 366.26.

(E) In the case of a nonminor dependent, the court has dismissed dependency or transitional jurisdiction subsequent to the approval of
 the nonminor dependent adoption petition pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 366.31.

(F) In the case of an Indian child who was a dependent of the juvenile court immediately prior to the transfer of the Indian child’s case pursuant to Section 305.5, a final order of adoption issued by the tribal court of the child’s tribe.

(2) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific paragraph (1) by means of all-county letters, written directives, interim licensing standards, or similar written instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters, written directives, interim licensing standards, or similar written instructions shall have the same force and
 effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(b) The child has at least one of the following characteristics that are barriers to the child’s adoption:

(1) Adoptive placement without financial assistance is unlikely because of membership in a sibling group that should remain intact or by virtue of race, ethnicity, color, language, three years of age or older, or parental background of a medical or behavioral nature that can be determined to adversely affect the development of the child.

(2) Adoptive placement without financial assistance is unlikely because the child has a mental, physical, emotional, or medical disability that has been certified by a licensed professional competent to make an assessment and operating within the scope of that licensee’s profession. This paragraph
 shall also apply to children with a developmental disability, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 4512, including those determined to require out-of-home nonmedical care, as described in Section 11464.

(c) The need for an adoption subsidy is evidenced by an unsuccessful search for an adoptive home to take the child without financial assistance, as documented in the case file of the prospective adoptive child. The requirement for this search shall be waived when it would be against the best interest of the child because of the existence of significant emotional ties with prospective adoptive parents while in the care of these persons as a foster child.

(d) The child satisfies any of the following criteria:

(1) The child is under 18 years of age.

(2) The child is under 21 years of age and has a mental or physical handicap that warrants the continuation of assistance.

(3) Effective January 1, 2012, the child is under 19 years of age, effective January 1, 2013, the child is under 20 years of age, and effective January 1, 2014, the child is under 21 years of age and as described in Section 10103.5, and has attained 16 years of age before the adoption assistance agreement became effective, and one or more of the conditions specified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403 applies.

(e) The adoptive family is responsible for the child pursuant to the terms of an adoptive placement agreement or a final decree of adoption and has signed an adoption assistance agreement.

(f) The adoptive family is legally responsible for
 the support of the child and the child is receiving support from the adoptive parent.

(g) The department or the county responsible for determining the child’s Adoption Assistance Program eligibility status and for providing financial aid, and the prospective adoptive parent, prior to or at the time the adoption decree is issued by the court, have signed an adoption assistance agreement that stipulates the need for, and the amount of, Adoption Assistance Program benefits.

(h) The prospective adoptive parent or any adult living in the prospective adoptive home has completed the criminal background check requirements pursuant to Section 671(a)(20)(A) and (C) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(i) To be eligible for state funding, the child is the subject of an agency adoption, as defined in Section 8506 of the
 Family Code, and was any of the following:

(1) Under the supervision of a county welfare department as the subject of a legal guardianship or juvenile court dependency.

(2) Relinquished for adoption to a licensed California private or public adoption agency, or another public agency operating a Title IV-E program on behalf of the state, and would have otherwise been at risk of dependency as certified by the responsible public child welfare agency.

(3) Committed to the care of the department pursuant to Section 8805 or 8918 of the Family Code.

(4) The child is an Indian child and the subject of an order of adoption based on tribal customary adoption of an Indian child, as described in Section 366.24. Notwithstanding Section 8600.5 of the Family Code, for
 purposes of this subdivision a tribal customary adoption shall be considered an agency adoption.

(j) To be eligible for federal funding, in the case of a child who is not an applicable child for the federal fiscal year, as defined in subdivision (n), the child satisfies any of the following criteria:

(1) Prior to the finalization of an agency adoption, as defined in Section 8506 of the Family Code, or an independent adoption, as defined in Section 8524 of the Family Code, is filed, the child has met the requirements to receive federal supplemental security income benefits pursuant to Subchapter 16 (commencing with Section 1381) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code, as determined and documented by the federal Social Security Administration.

(2) The child was removed from the home of a specified relative
 and the child would have been AFDC eligible in the home of removal according to Section 606(a) or 607 of Title 42 of the United States Code, as those sections were in effect on July 16, 1996, in the month of the voluntary placement agreement or in the month court proceedings are initiated to remove the child, resulting in a judicial determination that continuation in the home would be contrary to the child’s welfare. The child must have been living with the specified relative from whom the child was removed within six months of the month the voluntary placement agreement was signed or the petition to remove was filed.

(3) The child was voluntarily relinquished to a licensed public or private adoption agency, or another public agency operating a Title IV-E program on behalf of the state, and there is a petition to the court to remove the child from the home within six months of the time the child lived with a specified relative and a subsequent
 judicial determination that remaining in the home would be contrary to the child’s welfare.

(4) Title IV-E foster care maintenance was paid on behalf of the child’s minor parent and covered the cost of the minor parent’s child while the child was in the foster family home or child care institution with the minor parent.

(5) The child is an Indian child and the subject of an order of adoption based on tribal customary adoption of an Indian child, as described in Section 366.24.

(k) To be eligible for federal funding, in the case of a child who is an applicable child for the federal fiscal year, as defined in subdivision (n), the child meets any of the following criteria:

(1) At the time of initiation of adoptive proceedings, was in the care of a public
 or licensed private child placement agency or Indian tribal organization pursuant to either of the following:

(A) An involuntary removal of the child from the home in accordance with a judicial determination to the effect that continuation in the home would be contrary to the welfare of the child.

(B) A voluntary placement agreement or a voluntary relinquishment.

(2) The child meets all medical or disability requirements of Title XVI with respect to eligibility for supplemental security income benefits.

(3) The child was residing in a foster family home or a child care institution with the child’s minor parent, and the child’s minor parent was in the foster family home or child care institution pursuant to either of the following:

(A) An involuntary removal of the child from the home in accordance with a judicial determination to the effect that continuation in the home would be contrary to the welfare of the child.

(B) A voluntary placement agreement or voluntary relinquishment.

(4) The child is an Indian child and the subject of an order of adoption based on tribal customary adoption of an Indian child, as described in Section 366.24.

(5) The nonminor dependent, as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, is the subject of an adoption pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 366.31.

(l) (1) The child is a citizen of the United States or a qualified immigrant. If the child is a
 qualified immigrant who entered the United States on or after August 22, 1996, and is placed with an unqualified immigrant, the child must meet the five-year residency requirement pursuant to Section 673(a)(2)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code, unless the child is a member of one of the excepted groups pursuant to Section 1612(b) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, a “qualified immigrant” means a person who meets the definition of the term defined in Section 1641 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(m) A child or nonminor shall be eligible for Adoption Assistance Program benefits if the following conditions are met:

(1) The child or nonminor received Adoption Assistance Program benefits with respect to a prior adoption and the child or nonminor is again available for
 adoption because the prior adoption was dissolved and the parental rights of the adoptive parents were terminated or because the child’s or nonminor’s adoptive parents died and the child or nonminor meets the special needs criteria described in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive. When a nonminor is receiving Adoption Assistance Program benefits after 18 years of age and the nonminor’s adoptive parents die, the juvenile court may resume dependency jurisdiction over the nonminor pursuant to Section 388.1.

(2) To receive federal funding, the citizenship requirements in subdivision (l).

(n) (1) Except as provided in this subdivision, “applicable child” means a child for whom an adoption assistance agreement is entered into under this section during any federal fiscal year described in this subdivision if the child attained the applicable age for that federal
 fiscal year before the end of that federal fiscal year.

(A) For federal fiscal year 2010, the applicable age is 16 years.

(B) For federal fiscal year 2011, the applicable age is 14 years.

(C) For federal fiscal year 2012, the applicable age is 12 years.

(D) For federal fiscal year 2013, the applicable age is 10 years.

(E) For federal fiscal year 2014, the applicable age is eight years.

(F) For federal fiscal year 2015, the applicable age is six years.

(G) For federal fiscal year 2016, the applicable age is four years.

(H) For federal fiscal year 2017, the applicable age is two years.

(I) For October 1, 2017, to December 31, 2017, any age.

(J) Effective January 1, 2018, to June 30, 2024, the applicable age is two years.

(K) Effective July 1, 2024, and thereafter, any age.

(2) Beginning with the 2010 federal fiscal year, the term “applicable child” shall include a child of any age on the date on which an adoption assistance agreement is entered into on behalf of the child under this section if the child meets both of the following criteria:

(A) The child has been in foster care under the responsibility of the state for at least 60 consecutive
 months.

(B) The child meets the requirements of subdivision (k).

(3) Beginning with the 2010 federal fiscal year, an applicable child shall include a child of any age on the date that an adoption assistance agreement is entered into on behalf of the child under this section, without regard to whether the child is described in paragraph (2), if the child meets all of the following criteria:

(A) The child is a sibling of a child who is an applicable child for the federal fiscal year, under subdivision (n) or paragraph (2).

(B) The child is to be placed in the same adoption placement as an “applicable child” for the federal fiscal year who is their sibling.

(C) The child meets the
 requirements of subdivision (k).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 175, Sec. 1.   (AB 2948)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

16120.05.

The adoption assistance agreement shall, at a minimum, specify the amount and duration of assistance, and that the amount is subject to any applicable increases pursuant to the cost-of-living adjustments established by statute. The date for reassessment of the child’s needs shall be set at the time of the initial negotiation of the adoption assistance agreement, and shall, thereafter be set at each subsequent reassessment. The interval between any reassessments may not exceed two years.

The adoption assistance agreement shall also specify the responsibility of the adopting family for reporting changes in circumstances that might negatively affect their ability to provide for the identified needs of the
 child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 32, Sec. 66.   (AB 106)   Effective June 29, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

16120.1.

Upon the authorization of the department or, where appropriate, the county responsible for determining the child’s or nonminor dependent’s Adoption Assistance Program eligibility status and for providing financial aid, the responsible county shall directly reimburse eligible individuals for reasonable nonrecurring expenses, as defined by the department, incurred as a result of the adoption of a special needs child, as defined in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, and subdivision (l), of Section 16120. Reimbursements shall conform to the eligibility criteria and claiming procedures established by the department and shall be subject to the following conditions:

(a) The amount of the payment shall be determined through agreement between the adopting parent or parents and the department
 or the county responsible for determining the child’s Adoption Assistance Program eligibility status and for providing financial aid. The agreement shall indicate the nature and the amount of the nonrecurring expenses to be paid. Payments shall be limited to an amount not to exceed four hundred dollars ($400) for each placement eligible for the Adoption Assistance Program.

(b) There shall be no income eligibility requirement for an adoptive parent or adoptive parents in determining whether payments for nonrecurring expenses shall be made.

(c) Reimbursement for nonrecurring expenses shall be limited to costs incurred by or on behalf of an adoptive parent or adoptive parents that are not reimbursed from other sources. No payments shall be made under this section if the federal program for reimbursement of nonrecurring expenses for the adoption of children eligible for the Adoption
 Assistance Program pursuant to Section 673 of Title 42 of the United States Code is terminated.

(d) Reimbursement for nonrecurring expenses shall be in addition to any adoption expenses paid pursuant to Section 16121 and shall not be included in the computation of maximum benefits for which the adoptive family is eligible pursuant to Section 16121.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 846, Sec. 49.   (AB 1712)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

16121.

(a) (1) For initial adoption assistance agreements executed on or prior to December 31, 2007, the adoptive family shall be paid an amount of aid based on the child’s needs otherwise covered in AFDC-FC payments and the circumstances of the adopting parents, but that shall not exceed the basic foster care maintenance payment rate structure in effect on December 31, 2007, that would have been paid based on the age-related state-approved foster family home rate, and any applicable specialized care increment, for a child placed in a licensed or approved family home.

(2) For initial adoption assistance agreements executed from January 1, 2008, to December 31, 2009, inclusive, the adoptive family shall be paid an amount of aid based on the child’s
 needs otherwise covered in AFDC-FC payments and the circumstances of the adopting parents, but that shall not exceed the basic foster care maintenance payment rate structure in effect on December 31, 2009, that would have been paid based on the age-related state-approved foster family home rate, and any applicable specialized care increment, for a child placed in a licensed or approved family home.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, for initial adoption assistance agreements executed on January 1, 2010, to June 30, 2011, inclusive, or the effective date specified in a final order, for which the time to appeal has passed, issued by a court of competent jurisdiction in California State Foster Parent Association, et al. v. William Lightbourne, et al., (U.S. Dist. Ct. No. C 07-08056 WHA), whichever is earlier, where the adoption is finalized on or before June 30, 2011, or the date specified in that order, whichever is earlier,
 the adoptive family shall be paid an amount of aid based on the child’s needs otherwise covered in AFDC-FC payments and the circumstance of the adopting parents, but that amount shall not exceed the basic foster care maintenance payment rate structure in effect on June 30, 2011, or the date immediately before the date specified in the order described in this paragraph, whichever is earlier, and any applicable specialized care increment, that the child would have received while placed in a licensed or approved family home. Adoption assistance benefit payments shall not be increased based solely on age. This paragraph shall not preclude any reassessments of the child’s needs, consistent with other provisions of this chapter.

(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, for initial adoption assistance agreements executed on or after July 1, 2011, or the effective date specified in a final order, for which the time to appeal has passed,
 issued by a court of competent jurisdiction in California State Foster Parent Association, et al. v. William Lightbourne, et al. (U.S. Dist. Ct. No. C 07-05086 WHA), whichever is earlier, where the adoption is finalized on or after July 1, 2011, or the effective date of that order, whichever is earlier, and before December 31, 2016, and for initial adoption assistance agreements executed before July 1, 2011, or the date specified in that order, whichever is earlier, where the adoption is finalized on or after the earlier of July 1, 2011, or that specified date, and before December 31, 2016, the adoptive family shall be paid an amount of aid based on the child’s needs otherwise covered in AFDC-FC payments and the circumstances of the adopting parents, but that amount shall not exceed the basic foster family home rate structure effective and available as of December 31, 2016, plus any applicable specialized care increment. These adoption assistance benefit payments shall not be increased based solely on age.
 This paragraph shall not preclude any reassessments of the child’s needs, consistent with other provisions of this chapter.
